Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 3 REGULATION OF RATES AND CHARGES
40-3-104.3. Manner of regulation - competitive responses - definitions - repeal.

Upon application by any public utility providing electric, natural gas, or steam service, the commission shall authorize such public utility to provide utility services to a specific customer or potential customer by contract without reference to its tariffs on file with the commission if the commission finds that:

For contracts with a specific customer or potential customer involving electric and steam service:

The price of any such service is not below that service's variable cost;

The customer, or potential customer, has expressed its intention to decline or discontinue, or partially discontinue, service, to provide its own service, or to pursue the purchase of alternate services from another provider;

The approval of the application will not adversely affect the remaining customers of the public utility; and

The approval of the application is in the public interest;

For contracts with existing customers involving natural gas service:

The customer has the ability to provide its own service or has competitive alternatives available from other providers of the same or substitutable service, except from another public utility providing or proposing to provide the same type of service;

The customer will discontinue using the services of the public utility if the authorization is not granted;

Approval of the application will not as adversely affect the remaining customers of the public utility as would the alternative;

The price of any such service provided pursuant to this subparagraph (II) shall be justified and shall not be less than the marginal cost of the service to the public utility. If the price is less than marginal cost, this shall be deemed to be an illegal restraint of trade subject to the provisions of article 4 of title 6, C.R.S.; and

The approval of the application is in the public interest.

Following a notice period of five days after the filing of an application under this section, the commission shall approve or deny the application within thirty days. All applications filed with the commission pursuant to this section shall be placed at the head of the commission's docket and shall be disposed of promptly within the time periods set forth in this subsection (1)(b)(I); except that, for good cause shown, the commission may extend the period in which it must act for an additional fifteen days, or, in extraordinary circumstances, including the existence of numerous pending applications under this section, the commission may extend the period in which it must act for an additional thirty days beyond the fifteen days provided for in this subsection (1)(b)(I).

Whenever the application is continued as provided in subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section, the commission shall enter an order making the continuance and stating fully the facts necessitating the continuance. If the commission has not approved or denied an application within the time periods set forth in subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section, the application shall be deemed approved. If the commission denies an application for approval within the permitted period, the subject contract does not become effective.

Any contract submitted pursuant to this section shall be filed under seal and treated as confidential by the commission; except that, at the time the applicant files an application or contract with the commission, the applicant shall also furnish a copy of the application to any public utility then providing electric, gas, or steam service in the state of Colorado to the customer, and also furnish a copy to the office of the utility consumer advocate, which office shall also treat the contract as confidential.

An application filed by a public utility pursuant to this section shall contain the name of the customer, a description of the services proposed to be provided under contract, evidence that the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) have been met, and any additional information required by the commission. The commission may dismiss an application if the applicant fails to provide information necessary to enable the commission to make the findings required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 2138, § 1, effective April 23, 1992.)

Within ten days after the execution of the contract, the public utility shall file with the commission under seal and as a confidential document the final contract or other description of the price and terms of service, together with any additional information required by the commission. The applicant shall also furnish a copy of the information to the office of the utility consumer advocate, which office shall treat the information as confidential. The commission has no authority to disapprove the contract if the contract complies with the conditions contained in subsection (1)(a) of this section, but the commission may consider the contract for general regulatory purposes and to ensure compliance with the requirements of this section.

For contracts involving electric and steam service, at the time of any proceeding in which a utility's overall rate levels are determined, the commission shall specify a fully distributed cost methodology to be used to segregate rate base, expenses, and revenues associated with utility service provided by contract pursuant to this section from other regulated utility operations. For contracts involving electric and steam service, if revenues from a service provided pursuant to this section are less than the cost of service as determined by the fully distributed cost methodology specified by the commission, the rates of other regulated utility operations may not be increased to recover such difference between costs and revenues.

For contracts involving natural gas service, the commission may require a public utility to segregate investments, expenses, and revenues associated with utility service provided pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section to ensure that such services are not subsidized by revenues from other utility operations. If the commission requires such segregation of such investment and expenses, it shall specify a fully distributed cost allocation methodology.

This section shall neither enlarge nor diminish the rights and obligations of a public utility operating under a certificate issued by the commission to serve customers within a territory pursuant to the provisions of article 3.5, 5, or 9.5 of this title.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit any public utility to provide electric, natural gas, or steam service to a customer of another public utility located in or for use in the service territory of such other public utility providing or proposing to provide the same type of service.

The commission has the right to inspect the books and records of any affiliate of a public utility to the extent that the affiliate uses any plant, or incurs any cost, or provides any service or product which is joint and common to the provision of public utility services and products subject to the jurisdiction of the commission. Upon application and for good cause shown, the commission may enter an appropriate protective order which directs the manner in which proprietary information shall be treated.

For purposes of this subsection (4), unless the context otherwise requires, "affiliate of a public utility" means a subsidiary of a public utility, a parent corporation of a public utility, a joint venture organized as a separate corporation or partnership to the extent of the individual public utility's involvement with the joint venture, or a subsidiary of a parent corporation of a public utility.

Nothing in this section limits or restricts the commission's authority to regulate rates and charges, correct abuses, or prevent unjust discrimination except as specifically provided in this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an investor-owned electric utility subject to rate regulation by the commission may offer economic development rates to a qualifying commercial or industrial customer.

An economic development rate approved pursuant to this section must be lower than the rate or rates that the qualifying commercial or industrial customer would be or currently is subject to under the utility's tariffs in effect at the time the qualifying commercial or industrial customer seeks to qualify for the economic development rate; except that an economic development rate must not be lower than the utility's marginal cost of providing service to the qualifying commercial or industrial customer.

The commission may approve investor-owned utility tariffs that provide for implementation of an economic development rate and set a minimum and maximum amount for the rate consistent with subsection (6)(b)(I) of this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (6)(b)(II)(A) of this section, the utility may negotiate and enter into agreements related to economic development rates with individual qualifying commercial or industrial customers without commission approval so long as the agreed-upon economic development rate complies with the commission-approved tariff and the addition or expansion of existing load at a single location is less than or equal to twenty megawatts. Any addition or expansion of existing load at a single location that is greater than twenty megawatts requires separate commission approval based upon a finding that the addition or expansion is consistent with this section.

An investor-owned utility may offer an economic development rate to a qualifying commercial or industrial customer for up to ten years.

An authorization granted by the commission pursuant to this section must include such terms and conditions as the commission determines are necessary to ensure that the economic development rates or charges assessed to other customers do not subsidize the cost of providing service to qualifying commercial and industrial customers consistent with subsection (6)(b)(I) of this section, and that there is no other subsidization of such service. In developing the terms and conditions, the commission shall consider, among other things, the rates and charges assessed to the utility's wholesale customers and the effects on other transmission system owners and users resulting from new transmission facilities constructed in connection with the utility's expansion of an existing voluntary renewable energy program or service offering.

In a commission proceeding related to economic development rates authorized pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, the utility bears the burden of proof to establish that:

The rates or charges assessed to other customers do not subsidize the cost of providing economic development rates to qualifying commercial or industrial customers;

The rates of other regulated utility operations do not increase; and

Other customers on the utility's system do not experience a rate increase due to a rate or rates offered to a qualifying commercial or industrial customer pursuant to this section.

The commission shall not impute to the utility revenues that would have been received from the qualifying commercial or industrial customer if the customer were being provided service under the corresponding rate for which it would have otherwise qualified under the utility's tariffs.

An investor-owned utility may seek commission approval to expand any voluntary renewable energy program or service offering, except those covered by valid agreements to the contrary executed and approved by the commission as of January 1, 2019, through the acquisition of additional renewable generation capacity and energy to meet the current and projected demand of:

Any commercial or industrial customer making a capital investment of two hundred fifty million dollars or more;

Any commercial or industrial customer that requires such expansion to remain as a customer of that utility; or

Any qualifying commercial or industrial customer entering the service territory of the utility.

The commission may approve, within one hundred twenty days, an expansion of an existing voluntary renewable energy program or service offering upon a showing by the utility that:

There is not sufficient capacity and energy in the existing voluntary renewable energy program or service offering to satisfy the needs of the customer and the customer meets the requirements of subsection (6)(d)(I) of this section; and

The availability of the program or service, either on its own or in combination with other incentives, is a substantial factor in the customer's decision to locate new or expand or retain existing business operations in Colorado.

As used in subsection (6) of this section and this subsection (7):

"Qualifying commercial or industrial customer":

Means a utility customer that:

Agrees to: Locate commercial or industrial operations in Colorado and add at least three megawatts of new load at a single location; or expand existing commercial or industrial operations in Colorado and add at least three megawatts of new load at a single location; and

Demonstrates, to the satisfaction of the investor-owned utility, subject to review by the commission, that: The cost of electricity is a critical consideration in deciding where to locate new or expand existing operations; and the availability of economic development rates, either on their own or in combination with other economic development incentives, is a substantial factor in the customer's decision to locate new or expand existing business operations in Colorado;

Does not include a customer that agrees to relocate or otherwise transfer its existing load of at least three megawatts from the service territory of another public utility, as defined in section 40-1-103, into the service territory of the utility offering economic development rates.

"Voluntary renewable energy program or service offering" means a program or other service offering approved by the commission that allows a commercial or industrial customer access to eligible energy resources, as that term is defined in section 40-2-124 (1)(a), on a voluntary basis, on terms and conditions deemed necessary by the commission. For a voluntary renewable energy program or service offering to be expanded, it must have been approved by the commission prior to the expansion request of a commercial or industrial customer pursuant to subsection (6)(d)(I) of this section.

This subsection (8) and subsections (6) and (7) of this section are repealed, effective January 1, 2028.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1535, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2138, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 2018:

(5) amended and (6) to (8) added, (HB 18-1271), ch. 362, p. 2159, § 2, effective January 1, 2019.

L. 2021:

(1)(b) and (1)(e) amended, (SB 21-103), ch. 477, p. 3414, § 13, effective September 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1271, see section 1 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

40-3-104.4. Simplified regulatory treatment for small or nonprofit water companies.

The commission, with due consideration to public interest, quality of service, financial condition, and just and reasonable rates, shall grant regulatory treatment that is less comprehensive than otherwise provided for under this article 3 to small, privately owned water companies that serve fewer than one thousand five hundred customers. The commission, when considering policy statements and rules, shall balance reasonable regulatory oversight with the cost of regulation in relation to the benefit derived from the regulation.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, a water company registered as a nonprofit organization under section 501 (c) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, 26 U.S.C. sec. 501 (c), is exempt from regulation under the "Public Utilities Law", articles 1 to 7 of this title 40.

Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of this section, all rates, charges, and terms and conditions of service between a water company described in subsection (2)(a) of this section and its customers must be just and reasonable. The commission shall resolve any complaint alleging a violation of this subsection (2)(b) in accordance with articles 6 and 7 of this title 40 if the complaint is signed by:

The mayor, the president of the board of trustees, or a majority of the council, commission, or other governing body of an affected city, county, city and county, or town;

The chief executive officer of an affected public utility; or

The lesser of:

At least twenty-five customers or prospective customers of the water company complained of; or

At least twenty-five percent of the current customers of the water company complained of.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 1469, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-134), ch. 91, p. 729, § 1, effective August 8.

40-3-104.5. Special provisions for rail carrier rate increases.

Notwithstanding section 40-3-105 and any other provision of this title to the contrary, the commission shall not exercise any jurisdiction over rates with respect to intrastate rail carriers.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 1037, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 215, § 2, effective March 29.

40-3-105. Free and reduced service or transportation prohibited - exceptions.

No public utility shall, directly or indirectly, issue, give, or tender any free service, ticket, frank, free pass, or other gratuity of services or any free or reduced rate transportation for passengers or property between points within this state unless a tariff so providing is first filed with and approved by the commission.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no public utility shall charge, demand, collect, or receive a greater or lesser or different compensation for any product or commodity furnished or to be furnished, or for any service rendered or to be rendered, than the rates, tolls, rentals, and charges applicable to such product or commodity or service as specified in its schedules on file and in effect at the time, nor shall any such public utility refund or remit, directly or indirectly, in any manner or by any device, any portion of the rates, tolls, rentals, and charges so specified, nor extend to any corporation or person any form of contract or agreement or rule or regulation or any facility or privilege except those which are regularly and uniformly extended to all corporations and persons; but the commission may by rule or order establish such exceptions from the operation of this prohibition as it may consider just and reasonable as to each public utility.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit or restrict any public utility from furnishing its service, product, or commodity to, or the receiving of its service, product, or commodity by, its employees, pensioners, officers, directors, or board members at no charge or at charges less than those prescribed in the utility's published schedules or tariffs.

No revenue shall accrue or be credited in the accounts of such utility with respect to such service, product, or commodity furnished at no charge nor with respect to any amounts by which charges for such service, product, or commodity are less than those prescribed in the utility's published schedules or tariffs.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 470, § 17.

C.L.

§ 2928.

L. 27:

p. 249, § 1.

CSA:

C. 137, § 18.

L. 41:

p. 599, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 115-3-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-3-5.

L. 69:

p. 931, § 14.

L. 73:

p. 1143, § 1.

L. 84:

(2) amended, p. 1039, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1033, § 69, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For penalties for violations, see article 7 of this title.

40-3-106. Advantages prohibited - graduated schedules - consideration of household income and other factors - definitions.

Except when operating under paragraph (c) or (d) of this subsection (1), a public utility, as to rates, charges, service, or facilities, or in any other respect, shall not make or grant any preference or advantage to a corporation or person or subject a corporation or person to any prejudice or disadvantage. A public utility shall not establish or maintain any unreasonable difference as to rates, charges, service, facilities, or between localities or class of service. The commission may determine any question of fact arising under this section.

Repealed.

A local exchange provider, as defined in section 40-15-102 (18), may enter into a contract, when necessary, specifying non-cost-based rates and conditions particular to that contract with one or more purchasers of services for applications of interactive video technology for purposes of distance learning, video arraignment of defendants in criminal cases, or examination, diagnosis, or treatment of patients in the course of medical practice. When an application is subject to a bidding process by the end user of the service, the local exchange providers offering component elements of interactive video technology pursuant to this paragraph (c) shall offer the component elements relating to a specific application to a specific end user to all bidders, including themselves, if bidding, at the same rates, terms, and conditions. This exception shall not apply to any other regulated service. A provider other than a local exchange provider may offer such interactive video services if such services are provided under the same terms and conditions as specified in this paragraph (c). Each contract entered into under this paragraph (c) shall be filed with the commission for information only.

Notwithstanding any provision of articles 1 to 7 of this title 40 to the contrary, the commission may approve any rate, charge, service, classification, or facility of a gas or electric utility that makes or grants a reasonable preference or advantage to income-qualified utility customers, even if the reasonable preference or advantage applies on a year-round basis, and the implementation of such commission-approved rate, charge, service, classification, or facility by a public utility shall not be deemed to subject any individual or corporation to any prejudice, disadvantage, or undue discrimination.

As used in this subsection (1)(d), an "income-qualified utility customer" means a utility customer who the department of human services, created in section 26-1-105; the organization defined in section 40-8.7-103 (4); or the Colorado energy office, created in section 24-38.5-101, has determined:

Has a household income at or below two hundred percent of the current federal poverty line;

Has a household income at or below eighty percent of the area median income, as published annually by the United States department of housing and urban development; or

Otherwise meets the income eligibility criteria set forth in rules of the department of human services adopted pursuant to section 40-8.5-105.

When considering whether to approve a rate that makes or grants a reasonable preference or advantage to income-qualified utility customers, the commission shall take into account the potential impact on, and cost-shifting to, utility customers other than income-qualified utility customers.

A commission-approved gas or electric utility rate, charge, service, classification, or facility that makes or grants a reasonable preference or advantage to income-qualified utility customers may apply to income-qualified utility customers on a year-round basis.

Nothing in articles 1 to 7 of this title 40 prohibits a public utility engaged in the production, generation, transmission, or furnishing of heat, light, gas, water, power, or telephone service from establishing a graduated scale of charges subject to this title 40; except that, for rates resulting from a rate design change approved by the commission on or after September 1, 2020, the commission shall require utility revenue or billing adjustment mechanisms to ensure that a utility's change in rate design results in a revenue-neutral outcome. In adopting new rate designs for residential customers, the commission shall evaluate the potential for higher bills due to changes in rate design. Rate designs that disproportionately negatively impact low-income residential customers compared to other residential customers of the utility are presumed to be contrary to the public interest.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the commission from revoking its approval at any time and fixing other rates and charges for the product or commodity or service as authorized by articles 1 to 7 of this title.

The commission shall order a fixed public utility, except a municipally owned utility, to increase its rates only to its customers in a municipality by adding a surcharge to recover the amount such fixed public utility pays to that municipality as a cost of doing business within that municipality under a franchise or pursuant to a license or occupation tax levied by the municipality, so long as the increase in rates by such fixed public utility is pursuant to a method of surcharge approved by the commission. Occupation tax as used in this subsection (4) does not include the employer and employee tax imposed by a municipality for the privilege of employment within that municipality.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 473, § 18.

C.L.

§ 2929.

CSA:

C. 137, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 115-3-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-3-6.

L. 69:

p. 932, § 15.

L. 81:

(4) and (5) added, p. 1912, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(5) repealed, p. 1555, § 3, effective June 17.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 1039, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1155, § 2, effective September 1.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1526, § 8, effective April 12.

L. 90:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1849, § 51, effective May 31.

L. 91:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1925, § 57, effective June 1.

L. 95:

(1)(a) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 245, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 2000:

(1)(b) repealed, p. 217, § 3, effective March 29.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1033, § 70, effective June 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(a) amended and (1)(d) added, p. 319, § 1, effective April 2.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 1792, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(d)(II)(A) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2124, § 181, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 13-194), ch. 89, p. 289, § 2, effective April 1.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (SB 20-030), ch. 148, p. 639, § 3, effective June 29.

L. 2021:

(1)(d)(II) amended, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3496, § 3, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(1)(d) amended, (HB 22-1018), ch. 109, p. 499, § 3, effective April 21.

40-3-107. Transmission of business of other companies.

Every telephone public utility operating in this state shall receive, transmit, and deliver, without discrimination or delay, the conversations and messages of every other telephone public utility with whose line a physical connection may have been made.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 473, § 19.

C.L.

§ 2930.

CSA:

C. 137, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 115-3-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-3-7.

L. 69:

p. 932, § 16.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1792, § 7, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For fixing of joint rates, see § 40-4-104.

40-3-107.5. Interconnection with renewable energy cooperatives.

Electric utilities shall interconnect with renewable energy cooperatives organized pursuant to section 7-56-210, C.R.S. Every renewable energy cooperative that desires to interconnect its system with any facilities owned or operated by a public utility shall comply with applicable interconnection rules and with reasonable standards and policies related to the reliability of the public utility system. All such standards and policies, as well as all costs for the interconnection, shall be fair, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory to each renewable energy cooperative.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1123, § 4, effective May 27.

40-3-108. Rates for long and short distances.

No telephone public utility subject to articles 1 to 7 of this title shall charge or receive any greater compensation in the aggregate for the transmission of any long distance message or conversation for a shorter than for a longer distance over the same line or route in the same direction within this state, the shorter being included within the longer distance, or charge any greater compensation for a through service than the aggregate of the intermediate rates or tolls subject to articles 1 to 7 of this title. Upon application to the commission, a telephone public utility may be authorized by the commission to charge less for a longer than a shorter distance service for the transmission of messages or conversations in special cases, after investigation; and the commission may from time to time prescribe the extent to which such telephone public utility may be relieved from the operation and requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 473, § 20.

C.L.

§ 2931.

CSA:

C. 137, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 115-3-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-3-8.

L. 69:

p. 932, § 17.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1793, § 8, effective July 1.

40-3-109. Street transportation public utility - transfers.

Every street transportation public utility shall, upon such terms as the commission finds to be just and reasonable, furnish to its passengers transfers entitling them to one continuous trip in the same general direction over and upon the portions of its lines within the same city and county, city, or town not reached by the originating vehicle.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 474, § 21.

C.L.

§ 2932.

CSA:

C. 137, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 115-3-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-3-9.

L. 69:

p. 933, § 18.

40-3-110. Information furnished commission - reports.

Every public utility shall furnish to the commission, at such time and in such form as the commission may require, one or more reports in which the utility shall specifically answer all questions propounded by the commission upon or concerning which the commission may desire information. All reports must be made under oath or affirmation.

The commission may require a public utility to file monthly reports of earnings and expenses and to file periodic or special reports, or both periodic and special reports, concerning any matter about which the commission is authorized by articles 1 to 7 of this title 40 or in any other law to inquire or to keep itself informed or which it is required to enforce.

The commission shall require every public utility that reports information on disconnections and delinquencies pursuant to section 40-3-103.6 (1)(i) to also file an annual narrative containing the utility's analysis of any trends or inconsistencies revealed by the data.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 474, § 22.

C.L.

§ 2933.

CSA:

C. 137, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 115-3-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-3-10.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-030), ch. 148, p. 639, § 4, effective June 29.

Cross references:

For duty of common carriers to report accidents, see § 40-9-108.

40-3-111. Rates determined after hearing.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing upon its own motion or upon complaint, finds that the rates, tolls, fares, rentals, charges, or classifications demanded, observed, charged, or collected by any public utility for any service, product, or commodity, or in connection therewith, including the rates or fares for excursion or commutation tickets, or that the rules, regulations, practices, or contracts affecting such rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, or classifications are unjust, unreasonable, discriminatory, or preferential, or in any way violate any provision of law, or that such rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, or classifications are insufficient, the commission shall determine the just, reasonable, or sufficient rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, rules, regulations, practices, or contracts to be thereafter observed and in force and shall fix the same by order. In making such determination, the commission may consider current, future, or past test periods or any reasonable combination thereof and any other factors which may affect the sufficiency or insufficiency of such rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, or classifications during the period the same may be in effect, and may consider any factors which influence an adequate supply of energy, encourage energy conservation, or encourage renewable energy development.

(1.5) (a) If the commission considers environmental effects when comparing the costs and benefits of potential utility resources, it shall also make findings and give due consideration to the effect that acquiring such resources will have on the state's economy and employment, including, but not limited to, the effect on the mining, electric, natural gas, energy efficiency, and renewable resource industries.

If the commission considers factors which encourage renewable energy development, it shall also make findings and give due consideration to the effect of such factors on the utility's ability to recover its capital and operating costs.

The commission has the power, after a hearing upon its own motion or upon complaint, to investigate a single rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, classification, rule, contract, or practice, or the entire schedule of rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, classifications, rules, contracts, and practices of any public utility; and to establish new rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, classifications, rules, contracts, practices, or schedules, in lieu thereof.

As part of any inquiry or investigation into rate structures of regulated electric utilities undertaken on or before July 1, 2009, the commission shall consider whether to adopt retail rate structures that enable the use of solar or other renewable energy resources in agricultural applications, including, but not limited to, irrigation pumping.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 475, § 23.

C.L.

§ 2934.

CSA:

C. 137, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 115-3-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-3-11.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1914, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1.5) added, p. 202, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 94:

(1) and (1.5) amended, p. 611, § 3, effective April 8.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 1793, § 9, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsections (1) and (1.5), see section 1 of chapter 102, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

40-3-112. Commission to provide local government with avoided cost information.

The general assembly hereby finds that it is in the interest of the people of this state to promote the production of energy and the disposal of solid waste in a manner designed to protect the environment; therefore, the general assembly hereby declares that it is the policy of this state to promote the development of systems which generate energy through the burning of solid waste in a manner designed to insure the maintenance of clean air standards.

Prior to the construction of a solid waste-to-energy incineration facility, any unit of local government contemplating construction of such a facility may, by written request, require the commission to calculate the avoided cost to a specified electric utility for the purchase of energy and capacity by said utility from said contemplated facility. Pursuant to such request the utility shall provide the commission with all data necessary to calculate said cost.

As used in this section, "solid waste-to-energy incineration facility" means a facility where flammable waste material is used as a primary fuel for the production of electrical power the total output of which exceeds one hundred kilowatts.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 1556, § 1, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For the authority of counties and municipalities relating to solid waste-to-energy incineration systems, see part 9 of article 20 of title 30 and part 10 of article 15 of title 31.

40-3-113. Rail rates for transportation of recyclable or recycled materials. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 1040, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 217, § 4, effective March 29.

40-3-114. Cost allocation - effect on competitive markets.

The commission shall ensure that regulated electric and gas utilities do not use ratepayer funds to subsidize nonregulated activities.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 2062, § 13, effective July 1.

40-3-115. Recovery of utility relocation costs.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Political subdivision" means a county, city and county, city, town, home rule city, home rule town, service authority, school district, local improvement district, law enforcement authority, water, sanitation, fire protection, metropolitan, irrigation, drainage, or other special district, or any other kind of municipal, quasi-municipal, or public organization organized pursuant to law.

"State" means the state government, any state agency, state department, state institution, or state-level authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 40-15-502 (3)(b)(I) to (3)(b)(V), local exchange providers of basic local exchange service subject to regulation pursuant to part 2, part 3, or part 5 of article 15 of this title may request authorization from the commission to recover the actual costs incurred for the relocation of infrastructure or facilities requested by the state or a political subdivision. Actual costs are the nonfacility costs incurred in the relocation plus the undepreciated amount of the facilities being replaced. Recovery of actual costs incurred for relocation is intended for those state and political subdivision requests that are determined by the commission to be beyond the normal course of business.

The commission shall verify the actual costs that may be recovered, determine the allocation of costs to various customers and services, and prescribe the method of such recovery. In no event shall the period of recovery of the relocation costs exceed three years.

In determining the allocation of the costs to be recovered, the commission shall consider the jurisdiction requiring the relocation and the geographic area that most directly benefits from the required relocation to determine the customers or services that will bear the costs.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 2640, § 1, effective August 6.

40-3-116. Electric vehicle programs - rates.

The rates and charges schedule for services provided by a program created under section 40-5-107 may allow:

A return on any investment made under section 40-5-107 by an electric public utility at the electric public utility's weighted average cost of capital, including the most recent rate of return on equity, approved by the commission, including by allowing a utility to earn a rate of return on rebates provided to customers through a transportation electrification program;

Rate recovery mechanisms that allow earlier, as determined by the commission, recovery of costs, including the use of rate adjustment clauses; and

Performance-based incentive returns or similar investment incentives.

By May 15, 2020, an electric public utility shall submit to the commission a proposal for a specific rate or rates for electricity supplied to commercial and industrial facilities used to charge electric vehicles that encourage vehicle charging and that support the operation of the electric grid.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-077), ch. 383, p. 3434, § 3, effective May 31.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-077, see section 1 of chapter 383, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.